Washington statutes.
RCW 25.15.371

Termination of registration.

The secretary of state may terminate the registration of a foreign limited liability company registered in this state under the circumstances and procedures specified in RCW 23.95.550.

[ 2015 c 176 s 7127; 2015 c 188 s 73.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.